Massachusetts, session 194th, S2113.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 12V and
inserting in place thereof the following section:–
Section 12V. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart the second
Monday in October as Indigenous Peoples Day and recommending that it be observed by the
people, with appropriate exercises in the schools and otherwise, to acknowledge the history of
genocide and discrimination against Indigenous peoples, to honor the histories and contributions
of Indigenous peoples, and to recognize and celebrate the thriving cultures and continued
resistance and resilience of Indigenous peoples and their tribal nations.
of 1